District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.36

Coverage of private contractual providers and private licensed providers.

Each private provider that contracts with the District of Columbia to provide employees to work in safety-sensitive positions and each private entity licensed by the District government that has employees who work in safety-sensitive positions shall establish mandatory drug and alcohol testing policies and procedures that are consistent with the requirements of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2036
as added Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 102, 52 DCR 2331

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 102 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-310, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3420).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 102 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).